Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.060

Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are to:

(1) Authorize and enable the director to prescribe marketing areas and to establish pricing and pooling arrangements which are necessary to prevent disorderly marketing of milk due to varying factors of costs of production, health regulations, transportation, and other factors in said marketing areas of this state;

(2) Authorize and enable the director to formulate marketing plans subject to the provisions of this chapter, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, which provide for pricing and pooling arrangements and declare such plans in effect for any marketing area;

(3) Provide funds for administration and enforcement of this chapter by assessments to be paid by producers.

[ 1993 c 345 s 3; 1991 c 239 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 6.]